Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4401
Presentence investigation; sentence suspension; probation; court orders; considerations.

(1) When any person is found guilty of a crime involving abuse as defined in section 42-903, the judge shall order a presentence investigation to be completed and returned to the court for consideration at the time of sentencing.

(2) At the time of sentencing, the court shall consider the safety and protection of the victim of abuse and any member of the victim's family or household when suspending a sentence or granting probation.

(3) The court may order the convicted person to complete a domestic abuse intervention program at the convicted person's expense in addition to any other penalties.

Laws 2004, LB 613, § 9.